Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.460

Recognition and enforcement.

(1) An arbitral award, irrespective of the country in which it was made, shall be recognized as binding and, upon application in writing to the superior court, shall be enforced subject to the provisions of this section and of RCW 7.05.470.

(2) The party relying on an award or applying for its enforcement shall supply the original award or a copy thereof. If the award is not made in English, the court may request the party to supply a translation thereof into English.

[ 2015 c 276 s 46.]